Texas statutes.
BUSINESS AND COMMERCE CODE

TITLE 11. PERSONAL IDENTITY INFORMATION

SUBTITLE A. IDENTIFYING INFORMATION

CHAPTER 507. CONCEALED HANDGUN LICENSES AS VALID FORMS OF PERSONAL IDENTIFICATION

Sec. 507.001. CONCEALED HANDGUN LICENSE AS VALID PROOF OF IDENTIFICATION. (a) A person may not deny the holder of a concealed handgun license issued under Subchapter H, Chapter 411, Government Code, access to goods, services, or facilities, except as provided by Section 521.460, Transportation Code, or in regard to the operation of a motor vehicle, because the holder has or presents a concealed handgun license rather than a driver's license or other acceptable form of personal identification.

(b) This section does not affect:

(1) the requirement under Section 411.205, Government Code, that a person subject to that section present a driver's license or identification certificate in addition to a concealed handgun license; or

(2) the types of identification required under federal law to access airport premises or pass through airport security.

Redesignated from Business and Commerce Code, Chapter 506 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(2), eff. September 1, 2017.